Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB82.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The secretary for aging and disability services shall,
upon application of a rural emergency hospital, grant a physical
environment waiver for existing nursing facilities to such rural emergency
hospital to transition not more than 10 swing beds to skilled nursing
facility beds, if such rural emergency hospital:
(1) Is currently licensed as a rural emergency hospital pursuant to the
rural emergency hospital act;
(2) was licensed as a hospital immediately prior to the rural
emergency hospital's licensure as a rural emergency hospital; and
(3) during such rural emergency hospital's licensure as a hospital,
such rural emergency hospital provided skilled nursing facility services or
critical access hospital swing bed services to patients for at least one year
without a finding of immediate jeopardy.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Critical access hospital" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 65-
468, and amendments thereto.
(2) "Hospital" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 65-425, and
amendments thereto.
(c) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the rural
emergency hospital act.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.